Missouri, session 2026, SB1409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 650, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 650.535, to read as
follows:
650.535. 1. There is hereby created within the
department of public safety a statewide program called the
"Purple Alert System" to aid in the identification and
location of missing persons with developmental disabilities
whose disappearance poses a credible threat of immediate
danger or serious bodily harm to themselves through
immediate and effective community and emergency response.
2. For purposes of this section, "developmental
disability" includes a mental or cognitive disability that
is not Alzheimer's disease or a dementia-related disorder;
an intellectual disability; a brain injury; or other
physical, mental, or emotional disabilities that are not
related to substance abuse; or any combination of such
conditions.
3. Before July 1, 2027, the department of public
safety, in cooperation with the state highway patrol,
department of transportation, department of health and

SB 1409 2
senior services, the state lottery, and local law
enforcement agencies shall:
(1) Develop a training program and alert system for
missing persons who have developmental disabilities that is
compatible with existing alert systems in the state. The
training program shall implement crisis intervention team
training to equip law enforcement officers with the skills
necessary to understand developmental disabilities, to de-
escalate interactions with persons in crisis, to facilitate
appropriate interventions, and to respond effectively to a
reported missing person emergency when the person has a
developmental disability;
(2) Establish policies and procedures for responding
to a reported missing person emergency when the person has a
developmental disability. The policies shall, at a minimum,
provide for the following:
(a) Immediate and widespread dissemination of critical
information when a person who has a developmental disability
is reported missing;
(b) Enhancement of emergency response teams'
competence by informing them of the unique behaviors and
needs of persons with developmental disabilities; and
(c) Measures to increase public awareness and
understanding of the risks associated with developmental
disability-related elopement to foster community support for
persons with developmental disabilities; and
(3) Require a law enforcement agency to do the
following, at a minimum, upon receiving a report:
(a) Contact media outlets in the affected area or
surrounding jurisdictions;
(b) Inform all on-duty law enforcement officers of the
reported missing person with a developmental disability; and

SB 1409 3
(c) Communicate the report to all other law
enforcement agencies in the counties surrounding the county
in which the report is filed.
4. The department of public safety shall administer
and promulgate rules for the implementation of the alert
system established under this section. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓